District of Columbia statutes.
22-3311

Disorderly conduct in public buildings or grounds; injury to or destruction of United States property.

Any person guilty of disorderly and unlawful conduct in or about the public buildings and public grounds belonging to the United States within the District of Columbia, or who shall wilfully injure the buildings or shrubs, or shall pull down, impair, or otherwise injure any fence, wall, or other inclosure, or shall injure any sink, culvert, pipe, hydrant, cistern, lamp, or bridge, or shall remove any stone, gravel, sand, or other property of the United States, or any other part of the public grounds or lots belonging to the United States in the District of Columbia, shall be fined not more than the amount set forth in § 22-3571.01, or imprisoned not more than 6 months, or both.

History

July 29, 1892, 27 Stat. 325, ch. 320, § 15
Oct. 20, 1967, 81 Stat. 277, Pub. L. 90-108, § 2
June 11, 2013, D.C. Law 19-317, § 214(e), 60 DCR 2064

Cross References

Conduct of prosecutions under this section, see § 22-1809.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 22-3111.
1973 Ed., § 22-3111.

Effect of Amendments

The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-317 substituted “not more than the amount set forth in § 22-3571.01” for “not more than $500”.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 214(e) of the Criminal Fine Proportionality Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-45, April 1, 2013, 60 DCR 5400, 20 DCSTAT 1300).

Editor's Notes

Applicability of D.C. Law 19-317: Section 401 of D.C. Law 19-317 provided that the act shall apply only to offenses committed on or after June 11, 2013.